California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 591, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

5809.

The State Department of Health Care Services shall continue to work with participating counties and other interested parties to refine and establish client and cost outcome and interagency collaboration goals including the expected level of attainment with participating system of care counties. These outcome measures should include specific objectives addressing the following goals:

(a) Client benefit outcomes.

(b) Client and family member satisfaction.

(c) System of care access.

(d) Cost savings, cost avoidance, and cost-effectiveness outcomes that measure short-term or long-term cost savings and cost avoidance achieved in public sector expenditures to the target population.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 191.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Financial Participation [5813. - 5815.]

5813.

County participation under this part shall be voluntary.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 153, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5813.5.

Subject to the availability of funds from the Behavioral Health Services Fund, the state shall distribute funds for the provision of services under Sections 5801, 5802, and 5806 to county mental health programs. Services shall be available to adults and seniors with severe illnesses who meet the eligibility criteria in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 5600.3. For purposes of this act, “seniors” means older adult persons identified in Part 3 (commencing with Section 5800) of this division.

(a) Funding shall be provided at sufficient levels to ensure that counties can provide each adult and senior served pursuant to this part with the medically necessary mental health services, medications, and supportive services set forth in the applicable treatment plan.

(b) The funding shall only cover the portions of those costs of services that cannot be paid for with other funds, including other mental health funds, public and private insurance, and other local, state, and federal funds.

(c) Each county mental health program’s plan shall provide for services in accordance with the system of care for adults and seniors who meet the eligibility criteria in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 5600.3.

(d) Planning for services shall be consistent with the philosophy, principles, and practices of the Recovery Vision for mental health consumers:

(1) To promote concepts key to the recovery for individuals who have mental illness: hope, personal empowerment, respect, social connections, self-responsibility, and
 self-determination.

(2) To promote consumer-operated services as a way to support recovery.

(3) To reflect the cultural, ethnic, and racial diversity of mental health consumers.

(4) To plan for each consumer’s individual needs.

(e) The plan for each county mental health program shall indicate, subject to the availability of funds as determined by Part 4.5 (commencing with Section 5890) of this division, and other funds available for mental health services, adults and seniors with a severe mental illness being served by this program are either receiving services from this program or have a mental illness that is not sufficiently severe to require the level of services required of this program.

(f) Each county plan and annual update pursuant to Section 5847 shall consider ways to provide services similar to those established pursuant to the Mentally Ill Offender Crime Reduction Grant Program. Funds shall not be used to pay for persons incarcerated in state prison. Funds may be used to provide services to persons who are participating in a presentencing or postsentencing diversion program or who are on parole, probation, postrelease community supervision, or mandatory supervision. When included in county plans pursuant to Section 5847, funds may be used for the provision of mental health services under Sections 5347 and 5348 in counties that elect to participate in the Assisted Outpatient Treatment Demonstration Project Act of 2002 (Article 9 (commencing with Section 5345) of Chapter 2 of Part 1), and for the provision of services to clients pursuant to Part 8 (commencing with Section 5970).

(g) The department shall
 contract for services with county mental health programs pursuant to Section 5897. After November 2, 2004, the term “grants,” as used in Sections 5814 and 5814.5, shall refer to those contracts.

(h) If amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election, this section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 39) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 38.   (SB 159)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Sec. 85 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 40.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.    See later operative version added by Sec. 40 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------

5813.5.

(a) Counties shall use funds distributed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5891 for the provision of behavioral health services under Sections 5801, 5802, 5806, and 5891.5 to county behavioral health programs. This part does not obligate the counties to use funds from any other source for services pursuant to this part.

(b) Services shall be available to eligible adults and older adults, as defined in Section 5892.

(c) Funding shall be provided at sufficient levels to ensure counties can provide each adult and older adult served pursuant to this part with the medically necessary mental health and
 substance use disorder treatment services and medications identified during the service planning process pursuant to Section 5806, which are in the applicable client clinical record.

(1) To maximize federal financial participation in furtherance of subdivision (d) of Section 5890, a county shall submit claims for reimbursement to the State Department of Health Care Services in accordance with applicable Medi-Cal rules and procedures for a behavioral health service or supportive service eligible for reimbursement pursuant to Title XIX or XXI of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396, et seq. and 1397aa, et seq.) when such service is paid, in whole or in part, using funds from the Behavioral Health Services Fund established pursuant to Section 5890.

(2) (A) To maximize funding from other sources, a county shall seek reimbursement for a behavioral health service, supportive service, housing intervention, or other related activity provided pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5892 that is covered by or can be paid from another available funding source, including other mental health funds, substance use disorder funds, public and private insurance, and other local, state, and federal funds. This paragraph does not require counties to exhaust other funding sources before using behavioral health services fund moneys to pay for a service or related activity.

(B) A county shall make a good faith effort to enter into contracts, single case agreements, or other agreements to obtain reimbursement with health care service plans and disability insurance plans,
 pursuant to Section 1374.72 of the Health and Safety Code and Section 10144.5 of the Insurance Code.

(C) A county shall submit requests for prior authorization for services, request letters of agreement for payment as an out-of-network provider, and pursue other means to obtain reimbursement in accordance with state and federal laws.

(3) (A) A county may report to the Department of Managed Health Care or the Department of Insurance, as appropriate, complaints about a health plan’s or a health insurer’s failure to make a good faith effort to contract or enter into a single case agreement or other agreements to obtain reimbursement with the county.

(B) A county may also report to the Department of
 Managed Health Care or the Department of Insurance, respectively, a failure by a health plan or insurer to timely reimburse the county for services the plan or insurer must cover as required by state or federal law, including, but not limited to, Sections 1374.72 and 1374.721 of the Health and Safety Code and Sections 10144.5 and 10144.52 of the Insurance Code.

(C) Upon receipt of a complaint from a county, the Department of Managed Health Care or the Department of Insurance, as applicable, shall timely investigate the complaint.

(d) Each county behavioral health program’s integrated plan pursuant to Section 5963.02 shall provide for services to eligible adults and older adults, as defined in Section 5892, in accordance with the system of care for adults and older adults.

(e) Planning for services shall be consistent with the philosophy, principles, and practices of the Recovery Vision for behavioral health consumers:

(1) To promote concepts key to the recovery for individuals who have a mental illness or substance use disorder, or both: hope, personal empowerment, respect, social connections, self-responsibility, and self-determination.

(2) To promote consumer-operated services as a way to support recovery.

(3) To reflect the cultural, ethnic, and racial diversity of behavioral health consumers by addressing the inequities in behavioral health service delivery.

(4) To plan for each consumer’s individual needs.

(f) The integrated plan for each county pursuant to Section 5963.02 shall indicate, subject to the availability of funds as determined by Part 4.5 (commencing with Section 5890) and other funds available for behavioral health services as defined in Section 5892, that eligible adults and older adults, as defined in Section 5892, being served by this program are either receiving services from this program or have a mental illness or substance use disorder that is not sufficiently severe to require the level of services required of this program.

(g) (1) Each county integrated plan and annual update pursuant to Section 5963.02 shall consider ways to provide mental health services similar to those
 established pursuant to the Mentally Ill Offender Crime Reduction Grant Program.

(2) Funds shall not be used to pay for persons incarcerated in state prison.

(3) Funds may be used to provide services to persons who are participating in a presentencing or postsentencing diversion program or who are on parole, probation, postrelease community supervision, or mandatory supervision or in a community reentry program.

(4) When included in county integrated plans pursuant to Section 5963.02, funds may be used for the provision of mental health services under Sections 5347 and 5348 in counties that elect to participate in the Assisted Outpatient Treatment Demonstration Project Act of 2002 (Article 9 (commencing with
 Section 5345) of Chapter 2 of Part 1) and for the provision of services to clients
 pursuant to Part 8 (commencing with Section 5970).

(h) (1) The department shall contract for services with county behavioral health programs pursuant to Section 5897.

(2) After November 2, 2004, the term “grants,” as used in Sections 5814 and 5814.5, shall refer to those contracts.

(i) For purposes of this section, “behavioral health services” shall have the meaning as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 5892.

(j) For purposes of this section, “substance use disorder” shall have the meaning as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 5891.5.

(k) For purposes of this
 section, “substance use disorder treatment services” shall have the meaning as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 5891.5.

(l) For purposes of this section, “supportive services” shall have the meaning as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 5887.

(m) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 39) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 40.   (SB 326)   Effective April 17, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.     Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5813.6.

(a) (1) By July 1 of each year, the Director of Health Care Services shall submit to the Legislature final budget enactment information regarding the expenditure of Proposition 63 funding for each state department, and for each major program category specified in the measure, for local assistance.

(2) This shall include actual past-year expenditures, estimated current-year expenditures, and projected budget-year expenditures of local assistance funding.

(3) It shall also include a complete listing of state support expenditures for the current year and for the budget year by the State Department of Health
 Care Services, including the number of state positions and any contract funds.

(4) A description of these state expenditures shall accompany the fiscal information the director is required to submit to the Legislature pursuant to this section.

(b) (1) During each fiscal year, the Director of Health Care Services shall submit to the fiscal committees of the Legislature, 30 days in advance, written notice of the intention to expend Proposition 63 local assistance funding in excess of the amounts presented in its May Revision projection for that fiscal year.

(2) The written notice shall include information regarding the amount of the additional spending and its purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 41.   (SB 326)   Effective October 12, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

5814.

(a) (1) This part shall be implemented only to the extent that funds are appropriated for purposes of this part. To the extent that funds are made available, the first priority shall go to maintain funding for the existing programs that meet adult system of care contract goals. The next priority for funding shall be given to counties with a high incidence of persons who have a serious mental health condition and are homeless or at risk of homelessness, and meet the criteria developed pursuant to paragraphs (3) and (4).

(2) The Director of Health Care Services shall establish a methodology for awarding grants under this part consistent with the legislative intent expressed in Section 5802, and in consultation with the advisory committee
 established in this subdivision.

(3) (A) The Director of Health Care Services shall establish an advisory committee for the purpose of providing advice regarding the development of criteria for the award of grants, and the identification of specific performance measures for evaluating the effectiveness of grants. The committee shall review evaluation reports and make findings on evidence-based best practices and recommendations for grant conditions. At not less than one meeting annually, the advisory committee shall provide to the director written comments on the performance of each of the county programs. Upon request by the department, each participating county that is the subject of a comment shall provide a written response to the comment. The department shall comment on each of these responses at a subsequent meeting.

(B) The committee shall include, but
 not be limited to, representatives from state, county, and community veterans’ services and disabled veterans outreach programs, supportive housing and other housing assistance programs, law enforcement, county mental health and private providers of local mental health services and mental health outreach services, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, local substance use disorder services providers, the Department of Rehabilitation, providers of local employment services, the State Department of Social Services, the Department of Housing and Community Development, a service provider to transition youth, the United Advocates for Children of California, the California Mental Health Advocates for Children and Youth, the Mental Health Association of California, the California Alliance for the Mentally Ill, the California Network of Mental Health Clients, the California Behavioral Health Planning Council, the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission, and other appropriate
 entities.

(4) The criteria for the award of grants shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) A description of a comprehensive strategic plan for providing outreach, prevention, intervention, and evaluation in a cost-appropriate manner corresponding to the criteria specified in subdivision (c).

(B) A description of the local population to be served, ability to administer an effective service program, and the degree to which local agencies and advocates will support and collaborate with program efforts.

(C) A description of efforts to maximize the use of other state, federal, and local funds or services that can support and enhance the effectiveness of these programs.

(5) In order to reduce the cost of providing supportive housing for clients, counties that receive a grant pursuant to this part after January 1, 2004, shall enter into contracts with sponsors of supportive housing projects to the greatest extent possible. Participating counties are encouraged to commit a portion of their grants to rental assistance for a specified number of housing units in exchange for the counties’ clients having the right of first refusal to rent the assisted units.

(b) In each year in which additional funding is provided by the annual Budget Act, the State Department of Health Care Services shall establish programs that offer individual counties sufficient funds to comprehensively serve adults with a serious mental health condition who are homeless, recently released from a county jail or the state prison, or others who are untreated, unstable, and at significant risk of incarceration or homelessness unless
 treatment is provided to them. In consultation with the advisory committee established pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), the department shall report to the Legislature on or before May 1 of each year in which additional funding is provided, and shall evaluate, at a minimum, the effectiveness of the strategies in providing successful outreach and reducing homelessness, involvement with local law enforcement, and other measures identified by the department. The evaluation shall include for each program funded in the current fiscal year as much of the following as available information permits:

(1) The number of persons served, and of those, the number who receive extensive community mental health services.

(2) The number of persons who are able to maintain housing, including the type of housing and whether it is emergency, transitional, or permanent housing, as defined
 by the department.

(3) (A) The amount of grant funding spent on each type of housing.

(B) Other local, state, or federal funds or programs used to house clients.

(4) The number of persons with contacts with local law enforcement and the extent to which local and state incarceration has been reduced or avoided.

(5) The number of persons participating in employment service programs including competitive employment.

(6) The number of persons contacted in outreach efforts who appear to have a serious mental health condition, as described in Section 5600.3, who have refused treatment after completion of all applicable outreach measures.

(7) The amount of hospitalization that has been reduced or avoided.

(8) The extent to which veterans identified through these programs’ outreach are receiving federally funded veterans’ services for which they are eligible.

(9) The extent to which programs funded for three or more years are making a measurable and significant difference on the street, in hospitals, and in jails, as compared to other counties or as compared to those counties in previous years.

(10) For those who have been enrolled in this program for at least two years and who were enrolled in Medi-Cal prior to, and at the time they were enrolled in, this program, a comparison of their Medi-Cal hospitalizations and other Medi-Cal costs for the two years prior to enrollment and the two years
 after enrollment in this program.

(11) The number of persons served who were and were not receiving Medi-Cal benefits in the 12-month period prior to enrollment and, to the extent possible, the number of emergency room visits and other medical costs for those not enrolled in Medi-Cal in the prior 12-month period.

(c) To the extent that state savings associated with providing integrated services for persons with a mental health condition are quantified, it is the intent of the Legislature to capture those savings in order to provide integrated services to additional adults.

(d) Each project shall include outreach and service grants in accordance with a contract between the state and approved counties that reflects the number of anticipated contacts with people who are homeless or at risk of homelessness, and the
 number of those who have a serious mental health condition and who are likely to be successfully referred for treatment and will remain in treatment as necessary.

(e) All counties that receive funding shall be subject to specific terms and conditions of oversight and training, which shall be developed by the department, in consultation with the advisory committee.

(f) (1) As used in this part, “receiving extensive mental health services” means having a personal services coordinator, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 5806, and having an individual personal service plan, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 5806.

(2) The funding provided pursuant to this part shall be sufficient to provide mental health services, medically necessary medications to treat severe mental illnesses,
 alcohol and drug services, transportation, supportive housing and other housing assistance, vocational rehabilitation and supported employment services, money management assistance for accessing other health care and obtaining federal income and housing support, accessing veterans’ services, stipends, and other incentives to attract and retain sufficient numbers of qualified professionals as necessary to provide the necessary levels of these services. These grants shall, however, pay for only that portion of the costs of those services not otherwise provided by federal funds or other state funds.

(3) Methods used by counties to contract for services pursuant to paragraph (2) shall promote prompt and flexible use of funds, consistent with the scope of services for which the county has contracted with each provider.

(g) Contracts awarded pursuant to this part shall be exempt from
 the Public Contract Code and the state administrative manual and shall not be subject to the approval of the Department of General Services.

(h) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, funds awarded to counties pursuant to this part and Part 4 (commencing with Section 5850) shall not require a local match in funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 243, Sec. 12.   (SB 862)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5814.5.

(a) (1) In any year in which funds are appropriated for this purpose through the annual Budget Act, counties funded under this part in the 1999–2000 fiscal year are eligible for funding to continue their programs if they have successfully demonstrated the effectiveness of their grants received in that year and to expand their programs if they also demonstrate significant continued unmet need and capacity for expansion without compromising quality or effectiveness of care.

(2) In any year in which funds are appropriated for this purpose through the annual Budget Act, other counties or portions of counties, or cities that operate independent public mental health programs
 pursuant to Section 5615 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, are eligible for funding to establish programs if a county or eligible city demonstrates that it can provide comprehensive services, as set forth in this part, to a substantial number of adults who have a severe mental illness, as defined in Section 5600.3, and are homeless or recently released from the county jail or who are untreated, unstable, and at significant risk of incarceration or homelessness unless treatment is provided.

(b) (1) Counties eligible for funding pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be those that have or can develop integrated adult service programs that meet the criteria for an adult system of care, as set forth in Section 5806, and that have, or can develop, integrated forensic programs with similar characteristics for parolees and those
 recently released from county jail who meet the target population requirements of Section 5600.3 and are at risk of incarceration unless the services are provided. Before a city or county submits a proposal to the state to establish or expand a program, the proposal shall be reviewed by a local advisory committee or mental health board, which may be an existing body, that includes clients, family members, private providers of services, and other relevant stakeholders. Local enrollment for integrated adult service programs and for integrated forensic programs funded pursuant to subdivision (a) shall adhere to all conditions set forth by the department, including the total number of clients to be enrolled, the providers to which clients are enrolled and the maximum cost for each provider, the maximum number of clients to be served at any one time, the outreach and screening process used to identify
 enrollees, and the total cost of the program. Local
 enrollment of each individual for integrated forensic programs shall be subject to the approval of the county behavioral health director or their designee.

(2) Each county shall ensure that funds provided by these grants are used to expand existing integrated service programs that meet the criteria of the adult system of care to provide new services in accordance with the purpose for which they were appropriated and allocated, and that none of these funds shall be used to supplant existing services to adults with a serious mental health condition. To ensure that this requirement is met, the department shall develop methods and contractual requirements, as it determines necessary. At a minimum, these assurances shall include that state and federal requirements regarding tracking of funds are met and that patient records are
 maintained in a manner that protects privacy and confidentiality, as required under federal and state law.

(c) Each county selected to receive a grant pursuant to this section shall provide data as the department may require, that demonstrates the outcomes of the adult system of care programs, shall specify the additional numbers of adults with a severe mental health condition to whom they will provide comprehensive services for each million dollars of additional funding that may be awarded through either an integrated adult service grant or an integrated forensic grant, and shall agree to provide services in accordance with Section 5806. Each county’s plan shall identify and include sufficient funding to provide housing for the individuals to be served, and shall ensure that hospitalization of an individual participating in the program
 is coordinated with the provision of other mental health services provided under the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 47.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5815.

The State Department of Health Care Services shall seek all available federal funding for mental health services for veterans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 195.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3.1. HUMAN RESOURCES, EDUCATION, AND TRAINING PROGRAMS [5820. - 5822.]

5820.

(a) It is the intent of this part to establish a program with dedicated funding to remedy the shortage of qualified individuals to provide services to address severe mental illnesses.

(b) Each county mental health program shall submit to the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development a needs assessment identifying its shortages in each professional and other occupational category in order to increase the supply of professional staff and other staff that county mental health programs anticipate they will require in order to provide the increase in services projected to serve additional individuals and families pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 5800), Part 3.2 (commencing
 with Section 5830), Part 3.6 (commencing with Section 5840), and Part 4 (commencing with Section 5850) of this division. For purposes of this part, employment in California’s public mental health system includes employment in private organizations providing publicly funded mental health services.

(c) The Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development, in coordination with the California Behavioral Health Planning Council, shall identify the total statewide needs for each professional and other occupational category utilizing county needs assessment information and develop a five-year education and training development plan.

(d) Development of the first five-year plan shall commence upon enactment of the initiative. Subsequent plans shall be adopted every five years,
 with the next five-year plan due as of April 1, 2014.

(e) Each five-year plan shall be reviewed and approved by the
 California Behavioral Health Planning Council.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 511, Sec. 17.   (AB 1688)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 2, 2004, by initiative Prop. 63.)
-------------------------------------------

5821.

(a) The California Behavioral Health Planning Council shall advise the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development on education and training policy development and provide oversight for education and training plan development.

(b) The Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development shall work with the California Behavioral Health Planning Council and the State Department of Health Care Services so that council staff is increased appropriately to fulfill its duties required by Sections 5820 and 5821.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 511, Sec. 18.   (AB 1688)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 2, 2004, by initiative Prop. 63.)
-------------------------------------------

5822.

The Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development shall include in the five-year plan:

(a) Expansion plans for the capacity of postsecondary education to meet the needs of identified mental health occupational shortages.

(b) Expansion plans for the forgiveness and scholarship programs offered in return for a commitment to employment in California’s public mental health system and make loan forgiveness programs available to current employees of the mental health system who want to obtain Associate of Arts, Bachelor of Arts, master’s degrees, or doctoral degrees.

(c) Creation of a stipend program modeled after the federal Title IV-E program for persons enrolled in academic institutions who want to be employed in the mental health system.

(d) Establishment of regional partnerships between the mental health system and the educational system to expand outreach to multicultural communities, increase the diversity of the mental health workforce, to reduce the stigma associated with mental illness, and to promote the use of web-based technologies, and distance learning techniques.

(e) Strategies to recruit high school students for mental health occupations, increasing the prevalence of mental health occupations in high school career development programs such as health science academies, adult schools, and regional occupation centers and programs, and increasing the number of human service academies.

(f) Curriculum to train and retrain staff to provide services in accordance with the provisions and principles of Part 3 (commencing with Section 5800), Part 3.2 (commencing with Section 5830), Part 3.6 (commencing with Section 5840), and Part 4 (commencing with Section 5850) of this division.

(g) Promotion of the employment of mental health consumers and family members in the mental health system.

(h) Promotion of the meaningful inclusion of mental health consumers and family members and incorporating their viewpoint and experiences in the training and education programs in subdivisions (a) through (f).

(i) Promotion of meaningful inclusion of diverse, racial, and ethnic community members who are underrepresented in the mental health provider network.

(j) Promotion of the inclusion of cultural competency in the training and education programs in subdivisions (a) through (f).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 23, Sec. 57.   (AB 1467)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 2, 2004, by initiative Prop. 63.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3.2. INNOVATIVE PROGRAMS [5830. - 5831.]

5830.

County mental health programs shall develop plans for innovative programs to be funded pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 5892.

(a) The innovative programs shall have the following purposes:

(1) To increase access to underserved groups.

(2) To increase the quality of services, including better outcomes.

(3) To promote interagency collaboration.

(4) To increase access to services, including, but not limited to, services provided through permanent supportive housing.

(b) All projects included in the innovative program portion of the county plan shall meet the following requirements:

(1) Address one of the following purposes as its primary purpose:

(A) Increase access to underserved groups, which may include providing access through the provision of permanent supportive housing.

(B) Increase the quality of services, including measurable outcomes.

(C) Promote interagency and community collaboration.

(D) Increase access to services, which may include providing access through the provision of permanent supportive housing.

(2) Support
 innovative approaches by doing one of the following:

(A) Introducing new mental health practices or approaches, including, but not limited to, prevention and early intervention.

(B) Making a change to an existing mental health practice or approach, including, but not limited to, adaptation for a new setting or community.

(C) Introducing a new application to the mental health system of a promising community-driven practice or an approach that has been successful in nonmental health contexts or settings.

(D) Participating in a housing program designed to stabilize a person’s living situation while also providing supportive services on site.

(c) An innovative project may affect virtually any
 aspect of mental health practices or assess a new or changed application of a promising approach to solving persistent, seemingly intractable mental health challenges, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Administrative, governance, and organizational practices, processes, or procedures.

(2) Advocacy.

(3) Education and training for service providers, including nontraditional mental health practitioners.

(4) Outreach, capacity building, and community development.

(5) System development.

(6) Public education efforts.

(7) Research. If research
 is chosen for an innovative project, the county mental health program shall consider, but is not required to implement, research of the brain and its physical and biochemical processes that may have broad applications, but that have specific potential for understanding, treating, and managing mental illness, including, but not limited to, research through the Cal-BRAIN program pursuant to Section 92986 of the Education Code or other collaborative, public-private initiatives designed to map the dynamics of neuron activity.

(8) Services and interventions, including prevention, early intervention, and treatment.

(9) Permanent supportive housing development.

(d) If an innovative project has proven to be successful and a county chooses to continue it, the project workplan shall transition to another category of funding as
 appropriate.

(e) County mental health programs shall expend funds for their innovation programs upon approval by the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission.

(f) If amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election, this section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 42) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 243, Sec. 13.   (SB 862)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.    See later operative version added by Sec. 43 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------

5830.

(a) (1) Each county shall establish and administer a program for housing interventions to serve persons who are chronically homeless or experiencing homelessness or are at risk of homelessness, as defined in Section 5892, and meet one of the following conditions:

(A) Eligible children and youth, as defined in Section 5892.

(B) Eligible adults and older adults, as defined in Section 5892.

(2) Housing interventions shall not be limited to
 individuals enrolled in full-service partnerships pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 5887.

(3) Housing interventions shall not be limited to individuals enrolled in Medi-Cal.

(4) Housing interventions shall not discriminate against or deny access to housing for individuals that are utilizing medications for addiction treatment or other authorized medications.

(5) Housing interventions shall comply with the core components of Housing First, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 8255, and may include recovery
 housing, as defined by the federal Department of Housing and Urban Development.

(b) (1) County programs for housing interventions may include any of the following:

(A) Rental subsidies.

(B) Operating subsidies.

(C) Shared housing.

(D) Family housing for eligible children and youth who meet the criteria specified in subdivision (a).

(E) The nonfederal share for transitional rent.

(F) Other housing supports, as defined by the State Department of Health Care
 Services, including, but not limited to, the community supports policy guide.

(G) Capital development projects, including affordable housing, as described in paragraph (2).

(H) Project-based housing assistance, including master leasing of project-based housing.

(I) Funds pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 5892 shall not be used for mental health and substance use disorder treatment services.

(2) (A) County programs for housing interventions may include capital development projects, under the provisions of Section 5831, to either construct or
 rehabilitate housing units, or both, for the persons meeting the criteria specified in subdivision (a) consistent with the State Department of Health Care Services guidelines for this purpose.

(B) The units funded pursuant to this provision shall be available in a reasonable timeframe, as specified by the State Department of Health Care Services and consistent with the county integrated plan pursuant to Section 5963.02, and shall meet a cost-per-unit threshold as specified by the State Department of Health Care Services.
